Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Board of Education

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 59 to 79, 99 to 133.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 81 to 84, 196 to 203.

§ 21-2-301.
Appointment; qualifications, terms and removal of members; meetings; chairman.

There is created a state board of education composed of fourteen (14) members, eleven (11) of whom shall be appointed members with at least one (1) member appointed from each appointment district pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

. Appointments from each appointment district shall be rotated among the several counties comprising the district. The remaining voting member of the board shall be the state superintendent of public instruction. The executive director of the Wyoming community college commission and the president of the University of Wyoming, or their designees, shall be ex-officio members and shall not have the right to vote. One (1) appointed member shall be appointed at large and shall be a certified classroom teacher at the time of appointment. One (1) appointed member shall also be appointed at large and shall be a certified school administrator at the time of appointment. Two (2) appointed members shall be appointed at large and shall be representative of private business or industry in Wyoming. On and after March 1, 2013 and upon expiration of their respective terms, the appointments of the two (2) members previously designated to be representative of business or industry shall be at large, one (1) a representative of Wyoming private business or industry and one (1) a member of a school district board of trustees at the time of appointment. The first appointment to the term of such member which expires on or after March 1, 2013, shall be a school district board member at the time of appointment. The remaining seven (7) appointed members of the board shall be appointed from among the lay citizens of the state who are electors of the state, known for their public spirit, business or professional ability and interest in education. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the appointed members of the board shall be from one (1) political party. Members shall be appointed for six (6) year terms, except those who may be appointed to fill unexpired terms. Members shall be appointed by the governor with the approval of the senate. Vacancies shall be filled by the governor without senate approval until the next session of the legislature. No member is eligible to reappointment, except any member appointed to fill an unexpired term of less than six (6) years may be reappointed for one (1) additional six (6) year term. Appointed members of the board may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

During the first quarter of the calendar year a meeting shall be held at which a chairman shall be elected. Meetings may be held at regular intervals as often as the duties of the board require and the board shall meet at the call of the state superintendent of public instruction or the governor or the chairman whenever in the opinion of these officials, or any of them, the need for such meeting exists.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall not participate in board deliberations on or vote on any matter relating to a contested case involving actions of the department of education.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 127, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 2331; R.S. 1931, § 99-104; C.S. 1945, § 67-104; W.S. 1957, § 21-4; Laws 1959, ch. 109, § 1; 1967, ch. 96, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 11; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-11; Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 122, § 1; 1996, ch. 28, § 1; 2006, ch. 43, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2013 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 92, § 4, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “appointed” for “other” and made similar changes throughout, substituted “twelve (12) voting members, eleven (11) of whom shall be appointed members, with at least one (1) member appointed” for “eleven (11) members, at least one (1) of whom shall be,” inserted the second sentence, deleted the last sentence which read: “The state superintendent shall be ex officio a member of such board and shall not have the right to vote”; added (c); and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 43, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 1, § 2, in (a), substituted “thirteen (13)” for “twelve (12)”, added “voting” preceding “appointed members”, substituted “members” for “voting member” in the second sentence, added “and the director of the state department of education” at the end of the second sentence, and added the third sentence; and in (c), added “and the director” preceding “shall not”, and deleted “or vote on” after “deliberations on”.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved January 29, 2013.

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 51, § 1, in (a), added the second, seventh and eighth sentences, and deleted “and the term expires on or after January 1, 1996,” following “less than six (6) years”.

Laws 2013, ch. 51, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 15, 2013.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

by ch. 92, §
4, in the first sentence of (a), substituted “thirteen (13” for “twelve (12)”; and added the fourth sentence in (a).

Laws 2014, ch. 92, § 4 superseded alternative provisions in section 2 of the act and became effective July 1, 2014, upon the Governor's certification of the issuance of a final court order as specified in section 5(b)and (c) of the act.

The 2015 amendment,

in (c), deleted “and the director” following “superintendent of public instruction,” and inserted “or vote on.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “six (6)” following “Not more than” toward the end of (a).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “fourteen (14) members” for “thirteen (13) members” in the first sentence, and substituted “and the president of the University of Wyoming, or their designees, shall be ex-officio members” for “shall be an ex-officio member” in the third sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Stated

in

Wyoming State Dep't of Educ. v. Barber, 649 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 374

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 21-2-302.
Quorum; majority vote.

A majority of the number of voting members of the state board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. A majority vote of the entire state board shall be required for official action.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-12; 1994, ch. 17, § 1.

Applied

in

Wyoming State Dep't of Educ. v. Barber, 649 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 374

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 21-2-303.
Expenses.

All appointed members of the state board shall receive compensation, per diem, and mileage for actual time spent in performance of their duties and traveling expenses while in attendance, and going to and from board meetings in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 127, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 2339; R.S. 1931, § 99-110; Laws 1945, ch. 107, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-110, 67-111; W.S. 1957, § 21-10; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 13; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-13; Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 43, § 1; 2013 ch. 195, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “appointed” for “voting.”

Laws 2006, ch. 43, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2013 amendment,

rewrote the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 195, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.